Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1405.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3301(j) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 3301. Arson and related offenses.* * *(j) Definitions.--As used in this section the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Actively engaged in fighting the fire." The following:(1) In active duty in the protection of the public against fire, which shall include:(i) Efforts to detect fires.(ii) Firefighting response.(iii) Extinguishing fires.12345678910111213141516171819 (iv) Efforts in response to a fire to protect life and property, including obtaining adequate equipment.(v) Measures to actively assist in activities under subparagraph (i), (ii), (iii) or (iv).(vi) Any other activity that assists with the suppression of an active fire, including, but not limited to, traffic control, station standby or any other action by a first responder which occurred as a result of the arson.(2) Nothing in this definition shall be construed to include fundraising to support firefighter services in this Commonwealth.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1405PN1854 - 2 - 1234567891011121314